Illinois, session 104th, HB1716.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Election Code is amended by changing 5Sections 7-41 and 17-29 as follows: 6    (10 ILCS 5/7-41)  (from Ch. 46, par. 7-41)7    Sec. 7-41. (a) All officers upon whom is imposed by law the 8duty of designating and providing polling places for general 9elections, shall provide in each such polling place so 10designated and provided, a sufficient number of booths for 11such primary election, which booths shall be provided with 12shelves, such supplies and pencils as will enable the voter to 13prepare his ballot for voting and in which voters may prepare 14their ballots screened from all observation as to the manner 15in which they do so. Such booths shall be within plain view of 16the election officers and both they and the ballot boxes shall 17be within plain view of those within the proximity of the 18voting booths. No person other than election officers and the 19challengers allowed by law and those admitted for the purpose 20of voting, as hereinafter provided, shall be permitted within 21the proximity of the voting booths, except by authority of the 22primary officers to keep order and enforce the law.23    (b) The number of such voting booths shall not be less than   HB1716- 2 -LRB104 08279 SPS 18330 b1one to every seventy-five voters or fraction thereof, who 2voted at the last preceding election in the precinct or 3election district.4    (c) No person shall do any electioneering or soliciting of 5votes on primary day within any polling place or within 100 one 6hundred feet of any polling place, or, at the option of a 7church or private school, on any of the property of that church 8or private school that is a polling place. Election officers 9shall place 2 or more cones, small United States national 10flags, or some other marker a distance of 100 horizontal feet 11from each entrance to the room used by voters to engage in 12voting, which shall be known as the polling room. If the 13polling room is located within a building that is a private 14business, a public or private school, or a church or other 15organization founded for the purpose of religious worship and 16the distance of 100 horizontal feet ends within the interior 17of the building, then the markers shall be placed outside of 18the building at each entrance used by voters to enter that 19building on the grounds adjacent to the thoroughfare or 20walkway. If the polling room is located within a public or 21private building with 2 or more floors and the polling room is 22located on the ground floor, then the markers shall be placed 23100 horizontal feet from each entrance to the polling room 24used by voters to engage in voting. If the polling room is 25located in a public or private building with 2 or more floors 26and the polling room is located on a floor above or below the   HB1716- 3 -LRB104 08279 SPS 18330 b1ground floor, then the markers shall be placed a distance of 2100 feet from the nearest elevator or staircase used by voters 3on the ground floor to access the floor where the polling room 4is located. The area within where the markers are placed shall 5be known as a campaign free zone, and electioneering is 6prohibited pursuant to this subsection. Notwithstanding any 7other provision of this Section, a church or private school 8may choose to apply the campaign free zone to its entire 9property, and, if so, the markers shall be placed near the 10boundaries on the grounds adjacent to the thoroughfares or 11walkways leading to the entrances used by the voters. At or 12near the door of each polling place, the election judges shall 13place signage indicating the proper entrance to the polling 14place. In addition, the election judges shall ensure that a 15sign identifying the location of the polling place is placed 16on a nearby public roadway. The State Board of Elections shall 17establish guidelines for the placement of polling place 18signage. 19    The area on polling place property beyond the campaign 20free zone, whether publicly or privately owned, is a public 21forum for the time that the polls are open on an election day. 22At the request of election officers any publicly owned 23building must be made available for use as a polling place. A 24person shall have the right to congregate and engage in 25electioneering on any polling place property while the polls 26are open beyond the campaign free zone, including but not   HB1716- 4 -LRB104 08279 SPS 18330 b1limited to, the placement of temporary signs. This subsection 2shall be construed liberally in favor of persons engaging in 3electioneering on all polling place property beyond the 4campaign free zone for the time that the polls are open on an 5election day.6    (d) The regulation of electioneering on polling place 7property on an election day, including but not limited to the 8placement of temporary signs, is an exclusive power and 9function of the State. A home rule unit may not regulate 10electioneering and any ordinance or local law contrary to 11subsection (c) is declared void. This is a denial and 12limitation of home rule powers and functions under subsection 13(h) of Section 6 of Article VII of the Illinois Constitution.14(Source: P.A. 95-699, eff. 11-9-07.) 15    (10 ILCS 5/17-29)  (from Ch. 46, par. 17-29)16    Sec. 17-29. (a) No judge of election, pollwatcher, or 17other person shall, at any primary or election, do any 18electioneering or soliciting of votes or engage in any 19political discussion within any polling place, within 100 feet 20of any polling place, or, at the option of a church or private 21school, on any of the property of that church or private school 22that is a polling place; no person shall interrupt, hinder or 23oppose any voter while approaching within those areas for the 24purpose of voting. Judges of election shall enforce the 25provisions of this Section.  HB1716- 5 -LRB104 08279 SPS 18330 b1    (b) Election officers shall place 2 or more cones, small 2United States national flags, or some other marker a distance 3of 100 horizontal feet from each entrance to the room used by 4voters to engage in voting, which shall be known as the polling 5room. If the polling room is located within a building that is 6a private business, a public or private school, or a church or 7other organization founded for the purpose of religious 8worship and the distance of 100 horizontal feet ends within 9the interior of the building, then the markers shall be placed 10outside of the building at each entrance used by voters to 11enter that building on the grounds adjacent to the 12thoroughfare or walkway. If the polling room is located within 13a public or private building with 2 or more floors and the 14polling room is located on the ground floor, then the markers 15shall be placed 100 horizontal feet from each entrance to the 16polling room used by voters to engage in voting. If the polling 17room is located in a public or private building with 2 or more 18floors and the polling room is located on a floor above or 19below the ground floor, then the markers shall be placed a 20distance of 100 feet from the nearest elevator or staircase 21used by voters on the ground floor to access the floor where 22the polling room is located. The area within where the markers 23are placed shall be known as a campaign free zone, and 24electioneering is prohibited pursuant to this subsection. 25Notwithstanding any other provision of this Section, a church 26or private school may choose to apply the campaign free zone to   HB1716- 6 -LRB104 08279 SPS 18330 b1its entire property, and, if so, the markers shall be placed 2near the boundaries on the grounds adjacent to the 3thoroughfares or walkways leading to the entrances used by the 4voters. If an election authority maintains a website, no later 5than 5 days before election day, each election authority shall 6post on its website the name and address of every polling place 7designated as a campaign free zone. This information shall be 8immediately provided to any person upon request, and a 9requester shall not be required to submit a request under the 10Freedom of Information Act. 11    The area on polling place property beyond the campaign 12free zone, whether publicly or privately owned, is a public 13forum for the time that the polls are open on an election day. 14At the request of election officers any publicly owned 15building must be made available for use as a polling place. A 16person shall have the right to congregate and engage in 17electioneering on any polling place property while the polls 18are open beyond the campaign free zone, including but not 19limited to, the placement of temporary signs. This subsection 20shall be construed liberally in favor of persons engaging in 21electioneering on all polling place property beyond the 22campaign free zone for the time that the polls are open on an 23election day. At or near the door of each polling place, the 24election judges shall place signage indicating the proper 25entrance to the polling place. In addition, the election 26judges shall ensure that a sign identifying the location of   HB1716- 7 -LRB104 08279 SPS 18330 b1the polling place is placed on a nearby public roadway. The 2State Board of Elections shall establish guidelines for the 3placement of polling place signage. 4    (c) The regulation of electioneering on polling place 5property on an election day, including but not limited to the 6placement of temporary signs, is an exclusive power and 7function of the State. A home rule unit may not regulate 8electioneering and any ordinance or local law contrary to 9subsection (c) is declared void. This is a denial and 10limitation of home rule powers and functions under subsection 11(h) of Section 6 of Article VII of the Illinois Constitution.12(Source: P.A. 98-1171, eff. 6-1-15.)